Massachusetts, session 194th, H4414.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Town of
Carlisle is authorized to amend its General Bylaws by adopting a Town Administrator Bylaw
which provides authority to the Town Administrator for the appointment, removal, and
management of all Town employees, which, except as provided herein, would otherwise be
appointed by the Select Board or other Town official or multiple member body.
SECTION 2. The Town of Carlisle General Bylaws are hereby amended inserting a new
Section, 3.3 Town Administrator, to be inserted before the existing Bylaw Section 3.3 Treasurer,
with all Article III Bylaw sections correspondingly renumbered to accommodate the new Section
3.3, as follows:
3.3 Town Administrator
3.3.1 The Select Board, as the Chief Executive Officer of the town, shall appoint, and
may remove, a Town Administrator. The Town Administrator shall be the primary agent of the
of 3

Select Board and shall be responsible for managing daily municipal operations at the direction of
the Select Board; provided, that the Town Administrator is not a policy creating position, and
shall not have the authority to create or set policy independent of Select Board approval or
authorization, nor may they do so on behalf of other town officials or multiple member bodies.
Except as specifically provided herein, the provisions of this bylaw do not transfer or
otherwise delegate the authority of the Select Board, or any other town officials or multiple
member bodies to the Town Administrator.
3.3.2 Pursuant to this bylaw, the authority to appoint and remove certain employees of
the town is provided to the Town Administrator; provided that the Select Board shall appoint and
may remove a Police Chief, a Fire Chief, a Town Clerk, Town Treasurer / Tax Collector, and
Town Counsel; and provided further that employees of the Carlisle Public Schools, Fire
Department, and Gleason Public Library, and the Board of Health shall be appointed, removed,
and managed by the School Committee or Superintendent, Fire Chief, or Gleason Public Library
Trustees or Director, or the Board of Health respectively.
Except as provided herein, the Town Administrator shall have authority to appoint, and
may discipline or remove, all other employees of the town, subject to the provisions of the
town’s duly adopted personnel policies.
Where any employee is responsible for assisting the operations of an elected or appointed
town official or multiple member body, the Town Administrator shall consult with such official
or multiple member body prior to making an appointment or removal under this section. In the
event of a vacancy, disability or absence anticipated to be greater than 30 days of any appointed
of 3

town official or employee, the Town Administrator may appoint another person to serve in an
acting or interim capacity for the period of such vacancy, disability or absence.
3.3.3 The Town Administrator shall supervise and manage the employees, operations,
and staff resources of all town departments and employees, except for employees of the School
Department, Fire Department, and Gleason Public Library, and the Board of Health. In this
supervisory and managerial capacity, the Town Administrator shall ensure efficient operation of
all town departments and facilities by implementing the policy directives of the Select Board, or
other town official or multiple member body as applicable.
3.3.4 The Town Administrator shall perform such other duties as directed by the Select
Board pursuant to Select Board policies.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3